Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2410.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 18, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding chapter 8, to read: CHAPTER 8 ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE ARTICLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS START_STATUTE18-801. Private communication with artificial intelligence; privileged A person's communication with an artificial intelligence is privileged if the person would have been entitled to privileged communication had the person sought the advice from a human professional. END_STATUTE